Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202645-357
Repayment of loan; licensee; duties.

Within thirty days after repayment of the loan in full, the licensee shall mark plainly every obligation or copy of the obligation and security or copy of the security signed by any obligor with the word Paid or Canceled and shall release any mortgage, trust deed, or lien, restore any pledge, and cancel and return any note or copy of the note and any assignment or copy of the assignment given to the licensee. For purposes of this section, a copy shall meet the requirements of section 25-12,112.

Laws 2025, LB474, § 78.